Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2540
Female convicted person; pregnant; notice to judge; procedures.

If a female convicted person under sentence of death shall appear to be pregnant, the Director of Correctional Services shall in like manner notify the judge of the district court of the county in which she was sentenced, who shall in all things proceed as in the case of an incompetent convicted person.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 25;

Laws 1986, LB 1177, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB36, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB268, § 35;

Referendum 2016, No. 426.
The repeal of section 29-2540 by Laws 2015, LB 268, section 35, is not effective because of the vote on the referendum at the November 2016 general election.
Mentally incompetent convicts, see sections 29-2537 to 29-2539.